Massachusetts, session 194th, H4148.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1 of Chapter 51 of the General
Laws, or any other general or special law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, lawful permanent
residents 18 years or older who reside in Shutesbury may, upon application, have their name
entered on a list of registered voters established by the Town Clerk for the town known as the
Town of Shutesbury and may thereafter vote in all Shutesbury town meeting, elections and
actions, and serve on elected and appointed Shutesbury municipal board, commissions and
committees.
SECTION 2. The Selectboard of the town known as the Town of Shutesbury may
formulate regulations and guidelines to implement to purpose of this act.
of 2

SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to confer upon lawful permanent
residents the right to vote for any state or federal office or any state or federal ballot question or
take any action relative thereto.
of 2